District of Columbia statutes.
28-2908

Territorial application.

(a)

The rights and duties of a corporation and its transfer agents in registering a security in the name of a fiduciary or in making a transfer of a security pursuant to an assignment by a fiduciary are governed by the law of the jurisdiction under whose laws the corporation is organized.

(b)

This chapter applies to the rights and duties of a person other than the corporation and its transfer agents with regard to acts and omissions in the District of Columbia in connection with the acquisition, disposition, assignment or transfer of a security by or to a fiduciary and of a person who guarantees in the District of Columbia the signature of a fiduciary in connection with such a transaction.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 674, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28-2908.
1973 Ed., § 28-2908.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.